Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 1. Medical Examiner; Procedures after Death.

Sec. 12.65.005.
Duty to notify state medical examiner.

Unless the person has reasonable grounds to believe that notice has already been given, a person who attends a death or has knowledge of a death, in addition to notifying a peace officer, shall immediately notify the state medical examiner when the death appears to have

been caused by unknown or criminal means, during the commission of a crime, or by suicide, accident, or poisoning;

occurred under suspicious or unusual circumstances or occurred suddenly when the decedent was in apparent good health;

been unattended by a practicing physician or occurred less than 24 hours after the deceased was admitted to a medical facility;

been associated with a diagnostic or therapeutic procedure;

resulted from a disease that constitutes a threat to public health;

been caused by a disease, injury, or toxic agent resulting from employment;

occurred in a jail or corrections facility owned or operated by the state or a political subdivision of the state or in a facility for the placement of persons in the custody or under the supervision of the state;

occurred in a foster home;

occurred in a mental institution or mental health treatment facility;

occurred while the deceased was in the custody of, or was being taken into the custody of, the state or a political subdivision of the state or a public officer or agent of the state or a political subdivision of the state; or

been of a child under 18 years of age or under the legal custody of the Department of Health and Social Services, subject to the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12, unless the

child’s death resulted from a natural disease process and was medically expected; and

the child was under supervised medical care during the 24 hours before the death.

A person who attends a death or has knowledge of a death occurring in circumstances other than those enumerated in (a) of this section may notify the state medical examiners of the death if, in the person’s opinion, a death investigation under AS

12.65.020

—

12.65.025

may be appropriate.

The body of a person whose death has been or should be reported to the state medical examiner under this section may not be moved or otherwise disturbed without the permission of the state medical examiner.

History.

(§ 2 ch 103 SLA 1996; am § 8 ch 99 SLA 1998)

Sec. 12.65.007.
No duty for peace officer to respond to the scene of an expected home death.

A peace officer is not required by state law to respond to the scene of an expected home death if

the death was expected to occur due to the dead person’s state of health before death;

the death occurred at the dead person’s home as expected due to the dead person’s state of health;

a person authorized to determine and pronounce death determines and pronounces the death; and

a form signed by the dead person’s physician concerning the physician’s expectation that the death would occur due to the person’s state of health and that it would occur at home was, at the time of death, on file with the law enforcement agency for that jurisdiction.

This section does not

prohibit a person from requesting a peace officer to respond to the scene described in (a) of this section if, in the person’s opinion, a death investigation by a peace officer may be appropriate due to suspicious or unusual circumstances; or

relieve a person of the duty to notify the medical examiner and a peace officer of a death that is described in AS

12.65.005(a)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1998)

Sec. 12.65.010.
Appointment of medical examiner. [Repealed, § 18 ch 103 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 12.65.015.
State medical examiner and deputies.

The commissioner of health and social services shall appoint a state medical examiner to perform the duties set out in AS

12.65.015

—

12.65.025

. The commissioner shall also appoint a deputy medical examiner, and may appoint assistant medical examiners, to perform or assist the state medical examiner in performing these duties. To be eligible for the position of medical examiner, deputy medical examiner, or assistant medical examiner, a person must be a physician licensed to practice in this state or, if the physician is licensed in another jurisdiction, the physician must be employed by the state or by an agency of the United States government within the state. The state medical examiner, deputy medical examiner, and assistant medical examiners are in the exempt service under AS

39.25.110

.

The state medical examiner and the deputy medical examiner must be physicians licensed to practice in the state who have education and experience in forensic pathology.

The state medical examiner and deputy medical examiner shall perform the duties assigned to the medical examiner and deputy medical examiner under AS

12.65.020

and regulations implementing that section, and other duties as assigned by the commissioner of health and social services.

The state medical examiner may, through contracts for services, appoint local, regional, and district medical examiners throughout the state to perform or assist in performing the duties assigned to the state medical examiner. To be eligible for appointment as a local, regional, or district medical examiner, a person must be a physician licensed to practice in this state or, if the physician is licensed in another jurisdiction, the physician must be employed by the state or by an agency of the United States government within the state. An appointment under this subsection may be for a term of up to two years.

The state medical examiner shall facilitate the formation of local, regional, or district child fatality review teams to assist local, regional, and district medical examiners in determining the cause and manner of deaths of children under 18 years of age. If a team is formed under this subsection, the team shall have the same access to information, confidentiality requirements, and immunity as provided to the state child fatality review team under AS

12.65.140

. A meeting of a team formed under this subsection is closed to the public and not subject to the provisions of AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act). A review by a local, regional, or district child fatality review team does not relieve the state child fatality review team under AS

12.65.120

of the responsibility for reviewing a death under AS

12.65.130

. A person on a local, regional, or district child fatality review team is not eligible to receive compensation from the state for service on the team, but is eligible for travel expenses and per diem from the Department of Health and Social Services under AS

39.20.180

. A person on a team formed under this subsection serves at the pleasure of the state medical examiner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 47 SLA 1993; am §§ 3, 4 ch 103 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 99 SLA 1998; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 76 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act)” was substituted for “AS

44.62.310

and

44.62.312

” in accordance with § 29(1), ch. 58, SLA 2010.

Administrative Code. —

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.

For cost of post-mortem examinations, autopsies, embalming and related services, see 7 AAC 35, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective October 12, 2005, in the first sentence in subsection (a) substituted “shall” for “may”, inserted “may appoint”, and made stylistic changes; in subsection (b) inserted “and the deputy medical examiner” and made stylistic changes; and in subsection (c) inserted “and deputy medical examiner” and “to the medical examiner and deputy medical examiner.”

Sec. 12.65.020.
Medical death investigations.

When a death is reported to the state medical examiner under AS

12.65.005

, the state medical examiner or the deputy medical examiner shall perform a medical death investigation. When a person dies under circumstances that, in the opinion of the state medical examiner, warrant an investigation, the state medical examiner or the deputy medical examiner may perform a medical death investigation. In performing the investigation, the state medical examiner or the deputy medical examiner may

order that the body of the person who has died not be moved or otherwise disturbed without the permission of the medical examiner;

request a peace officer to secure the scene and perform an on-scene investigation;

view the remains of the deceased person;

order the remains of the deceased to be transported to another location;

perform a post mortem examination;

perform an autopsy;

take possession of property considered necessary for the investigation;

subpoena and examine a person or record necessary in the opinion of the medical examiner to determine the material facts relating to the death; and

take other actions appropriate under the circumstances to determine the cause and manner of death.

When the state medical examiner or deputy medical examiner has completed an investigation or made the inquiry considered appropriate by the examiner, the examiner shall prepare a report of the examiner’s findings and conclusions. If the findings and conclusions indicate that the death may have been caused by criminal means, the state medical examiner or the deputy medical examiner shall submit a copy of the report to the district attorney responsible for prosecutions in the location where the death occurred. The investigative report is a privileged and confidential document, not subject to public disclosure under AS 40.25. It may be disclosed to public officers and employees for a public purpose and, when doing so will not interfere with an ongoing investigation or prosecution, to a person who is related to the deceased or who has a financial or personal interest in the estate of the deceased person.

The state medical examiner, the deputy medical examiner, or a prosecuting attorney may petition the court to hold a death inquest under AS

09.55.062

if the findings and conclusions of the state medical examiner or the deputy medical examiner, in the opinion of the state medical examiner, the deputy medical examiner, or prosecuting attorney, warrant the inquest. Otherwise, the state medical examiner or the deputy medical examiner shall cause a certificate of death for the deceased person to be completed and filed as prescribed by law.

The state medical examiner or the deputy medical examiner may direct the state registrar of vital statistics to amend a death certificate when, in the opinion of the state medical examiner or the deputy medical examiner, the death certificate is incomplete or inaccurate.

The state medical examiner may enter into agreements for services to be performed by persons in the course of medical investigations, and the state medical examiner or the deputy medical examiner may call upon public employees, including a peace officer or a village public safety officer, to perform or assist in performing the duties specified in this section.

The state medical examiner, the deputy medical examiner, and individuals who perform or assist the state medical examiner or the deputy medical examiner in performing the duties of the state medical examiner or the deputy medical examiner under this section are immune from civil liability based on determining the cause and manner of a person’s death.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall adopt regulations to implement this section.

History.

(§ 10.02 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 107 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 1988; am §§ 2, 3 ch 47 SLA 1993; am § 5 ch 103 SLA 1996; am §§ 4 — 9 ch 76 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS 40.25” was substituted for “AS 09.25” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS

09.25.100

—

09.25.220

.

Cross references. —

For recording of death certificates, see AS

18.50.230

.

Administrative Code. —

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective October 12, 2005, inserted reference to the deputy medical examiner in subsections (a) — (f); in subsection (a) added the language beginning “the state medical examiner” to the end of the first sentence; deleted “state medical examiner’s” preceding “investigative report” in the next-to-last sentence in subsection (b); and inserted “state medical examiner” in subsection (e).

Sec. 12.65.025.
Post mortem examinations.

The state medical examiner shall designate the facilities at which post mortem examinations and autopsies ordered under this chapter may be performed consistent with this section. The Department of Health and Social Services shall pay the costs of

post mortem examinations and autopsies ordered under this chapter;

related transportation to the location where the post mortem examination is conducted and then to the community closest to where the death occurred, except that transportation costs to another requested location shall be paid to the extent that the costs do not exceed the costs that would otherwise have been paid by the department for returning the body to the community closest to where the death occurred;

embalming, if embalming is required by law; and

cosmetology necessary to make the head, face, neck, and hands of the deceased presentable if those parts of the body are disfigured by the post mortem examination.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall provide clothing and a casket for the deceased if the person legally responsible for the burial, other than the state, is unable to pay for clothing and a casket and the responsible person does not object.

Instead of paying the cost of services listed under (a)(3), (a)(4), and (b) of this section, the Department of Health and Social Services may pay for the cremation and inurnment of the deceased if

the person legally responsible for the burial requests or approves the cremation and inurnment; and

the cost to the department of the cremation and inurnment does not exceed the cost to the state of services listed under (a)(3), (a)(4), and (b) of this section that the department would otherwise pay for or provide for the deceased.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall establish the maximum amounts or rates that the department will pay for services under this section. Facilities designated under (a) of this section, as a condition of their designation, shall agree to accept reimbursement from the department as payment in full for services provided by the facility under this section, and may not seek reimbursement for those services from a third party.

The state medical examiner shall designate a location for conducting a post mortem examination that is in the community closest to where the death occurred if

the state medical examiner has verified that a facility with adequate technology, personnel, and training is available at the location to enable the state medical examiner to direct a remote examination;

the facility meets applicable standards, including inspection and accreditation, for conducting remote post mortem examinations established in the Forensic Autopsy Performance Standards by the National Association of Medical Examiners; and

the cost of conducting the examination in the community closest to where the death occurred is less than the cost of conducting the examination or autopsy at another location, including the cost of transporting the body to and from another location to conduct the examination.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall provide to a person responsible for the burial of a body written notice describing the duties and procedures of the state medical examiner and the department under this chapter. The notice must explain, in a form and language that is designed to be easy to understand, the availability of

an option to release the body after examination and autopsy to a location other than a mortuary without a recommendation or stated preference to do otherwise;

the department’s coverage of costs associated with the examination or autopsy, transportation of the body, and necessary cosmetology as provided under (a) of this section;

clothing and a casket required under (b) of this section;

transportation to the community closest to where the death occurred or to another location;

a burial-transit permit as provided under AS

18.50.250

; and

a death certificate as provided under AS

18.50.230

.

A person is “unable to pay” under this section if the person

is eligible for assistance under AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

; or

is otherwise unable to provide clothing and a casket for the deceased.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1984; am § 6 ch 103 SLA 1996; am §§ 1, 2 ch 96 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (e) and (f) were enacted as (f) and (g) and relettered in 2014, at which time existing subsection (e) was relettered as (g).

Administrative Code. —

For cost of post-mortem examinations, autopsies, embalming and related services, see 7 AAC 35, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 15, 2014, in (a), in the introductory language, added “consistent with this section” at the end of the first sentence, in (a)(2), substituted “requested location shall” for “requested location may” and substituted “costs that would otherwise have been paid by the department for” for “costs of”, in (a)(3), inserted “, if embalming is”; added (f) [now (e)] and (g) [now (f)].

Collateral references. —

Civil liability in conjunction with autopsy. 97 ALR5th 419.

Secs. 12.65.030 — 12.65.090.
Coroners duties and powers. [Repealed, § 18 ch 103 SLA 1996. For current law, see AS 09.55.062 — 09.55.069.]

Sec. 12.65.100.
Unclaimed bodies.

When a person dies and no person appears to claim the body for burial, and no provision is made for the body under AS 13.52, the Department of Health and Social Services, upon notification, shall request a court order authorizing the body to be plainly and decently buried or cremated and the remains decently interred. A judicial officer shall issue the requested order upon the sworn testimony or statement of a representative of the Department of Health and Social Services that a person has not appeared to claim the body for burial and provision is not made for the body under AS 13.52.

History.

(§ 10.10 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 131 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 1973; am § 9 ch 107 SLA 1982; am § 7 ch 103 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective January 1, 2005, twice substituted “AS 13.52” for “AS 13.50.”

Sec. 12.65.105.
Release of property to temporary custodian.

A person having possession of tangible personal property of a decedent may release the property to a temporary custodian willing to take custody of and preserve the property pending the appointment of a personal representative or other transfer under AS 13.16. Upon execution of an affidavit that meets the requirements of court rules adopted to implement this section, the person delivering possession of the property is discharged from further obligation as though the person had dealt with the personal representative of the estate, and the temporary custodian is answerable and accountable for the property to any personal representative of the estate or to another person having a superior right.

History.

(§ 8 ch 103 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For court rule on temporary property custodians, see Rule 9.1, Alaska Rules of Probate Procedure.

Sec. 12.65.110.
Inventory and disposition of property.

If a body is unclaimed as described in AS

12.65.100

and money or other property belonging to the deceased is found, the public administrator shall inventory it and take it into possession for disposition under AS 13.16.

History.

(§ 10.11 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966; am § 10 ch 107 SLA 1982; am § 9 ch 103 SLA 1996)